District of Columbia statutes.
31-1344

Termination of proceedings.

(a)

When all assets justifying the expense of collection and distribution have been collected and distributed under this chapter, the liquidator shall apply to the court for discharge. The court may grant the discharge and make any other orders, including an order to transfer any remaining funds that are uneconomic to distribute, deemed appropriate.

(b)

Any other person may apply to the court at any time for an order under subsection (a) of this section. If the application is denied, the applicant shall pay the costs and expenses of the liquidator in resisting the application, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 45, 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., § 35-2844.